Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 13. Governing Boards of Public Institutions of Higher Education.

§ 23.1-1300.
Members of governing boards; removal; terms; nonvoting, advisory representatives; residency.

Members appointed by the Governor to the governing boards of public institutions of higher education shall serve for terms of four years. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. No member appointed by the Governor to such a governing board shall serve for more than two consecutive four-year terms; however, a member appointed by the Governor to serve an unexpired term is eligible to serve two consecutive four-year terms immediately succeeding such unexpired term. Except as otherwise provided in §

23.1-2601

, all appointments are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Members appointed by the Governor to the governing board of a public institution of higher education shall continue to hold office until their successors have been appointed and qualified. Ex officio members shall serve a term coincident with their term of office.

No member appointed by the Governor to the governing board of a public institution of higher education who has served two consecutive four-year terms on such board is eligible to serve on the same board until at least four years have passed since the end of his second consecutive four-year term.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E or any other provision of law, the Governor may remove from office for malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, or gross neglect of duty any member of the board of any public institution of higher education and fill the vacancy resulting from the removal.

The Governor shall set forth in a written public statement his reasons for removing any member pursuant to subsection C at the time the removal occurs. The Governor is the sole judge of the sufficiency of the cause for removal as set forth in subsection C.

If any member of the governing board of a public institution of higher education fails to attend (i) the meetings of the board for one year without sufficient cause, as determined by a majority vote of the board, or (ii) the educational programs required by §

23.1-1304

in his first two years of membership without sufficient cause, as determined by a majority vote of the board, the remaining members of the board shall record such failure in the minutes at its next meeting and notify the Governor, and the office of such member shall be vacated. No member of the board of visitors of a baccalaureate public institution of higher education or the State Board for Community Colleges who fails to attend the educational programs required by §

23.1-1304

during his first four-year term is eligible for reappointment to such board.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education shall adopt in its bylaws policies (i) for removing members pursuant to subsection E and (ii) referencing the Governor’s power to remove members described in subsection C.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education and each local community college board may appoint one or more nonvoting, advisory faculty representatives to its respective board. In the case of local community college boards and boards of visitors, such representatives shall be chosen from individuals elected by the faculty or the institution’s faculty senate or its equivalent. In the case of the State Board, such representatives shall be chosen from individuals elected by the Chancellor’s Faculty Advisory Committee. Such representatives shall be appointed to serve (i) at least one term of at least 12 months, which shall be coterminous with the institution’s fiscal year or (ii) for such terms as may be mutually agreed to by the State Board and the Chancellor’s Faculty Advisory Committee, or by the local community college board or the board of visitors, and the institution’s faculty senate or its equivalent.

The board of visitors of any baccalaureate public institution of higher education shall appoint one or more students as nonvoting, advisory representatives. Such representatives shall be appointed under such circumstances and serve for such terms as the board of visitors of the institution shall prescribe.

Nothing in subsections G and H shall prohibit the governing board of any public institution of higher education or any local community college board from excluding such nonvoting, advisory faculty or student representatives from discussions of faculty grievances, faculty or staff disciplinary matters or salaries, or any other matter.

The president or any one of the vice presidents of the board of visitors of Virginia Military Institute, the chairman or the vice-chairman of the State Board, and the rector or vice-rector of the governing board of each other public institution of higher education shall be a resident of the Commonwealth.

No baccalaureate public institution of higher education shall employ an individual appointed by the Governor to the board of visitors of such institution within two years of the expiration of his term. Such prohibition shall not apply to the employment of an individual to serve as an institution president or, in the case of Virginia Military Institute, the Superintendent.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 807, 835, 859, 935, §§ 23-41, 23-70, 23-72, 23-93, 23-95, 23-115, 23-117; 1924, p. 145; 1930, pp. 80, 81, 739; 1936, p. 262; 1938, p. 443; 1944, pp. 344, 345, 399, 400, 401; 1945, pp. 49, 50, 51, 52, 53, 55; 1946, cc. 414, 415; 1952, c. 213; 1954, c. 343; 1960, cc. 180, 187; 1962, c. 69, §§ 23-49.14, 23-49.16; 1964, cc. 48, 50, 70, 97, 159 §§ 23-155.4, 23-164.3, 23-164.5, 23-165.4, 23-165.5, 23-185, 23-187; 1966, cc. 14, 18, 679, § 23-216; 1968, cc. 93, 532, 719, §§ 23-50.6, 23-174.4; 1970, cc. 601, 624; 1972, cc. 51, 136, 550, 861, §§ 23-91.26, 23-91.28, 23-91.36, 23-91.38; 1973, c. 55; 1974, cc. 29, 317; 1975, c. 484; 1976, cc. 21, 25 §§ 23-49.25, 23-49.26; 1977, c. 670; 1978, cc. 376, 453; 1979, cc. 17, 147, 623; 1980, cc. 100, 559, 625, 648; 1981, c. 225; 1982, c. 356, § 23-9.2:5; 1983, c. 148; 1984, c. 772; 1989, c. 107; 1989, Sp. Sess., c. 5; 1991, c. 96; 1992, cc. 53, 103; 1993, c. 697; 1995, c. 40; 1999, cc. 752, 1013; 2000, cc. 699, 715, 844; 2002, c. 158, 257; 2003, c. 802; 2004, cc. 499, 519, 695, § 23-9.2:4.1; 2005, c. 12; 2007, cc. 471, 727; 2008, cc. 55, 155, 399, 465, 477; 2012, c. 599; 2014, cc. 190, 597; 2015, c. 560, § 23-2.06; 2016, cc. 473, 588; 2017, cc. 314, 764, 766; 2019, c. 373.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 473, amended former § 23-2.06, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by c. 473 has been given effect in this section by adding the last sentence in subsection E.

Acts
2016, c. 473, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of the first enactment of this act, any member of the board of visitors of a four-year public institution of higher education or the State Board for Community Colleges who was appointed to such board prior to July 1, 2013, and fails to attend the educational programs required by
§ 23-9.14:1 [now
§

23.1-1304

] of the Code of Virginia during his first four-year term shall attend such educational programs during the first two years of his subsequent term on such board.”

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “appointed and qualified” for “appointed and confirmed” in the next-to-last sentence in subsection A; and substituted “baccalaureate” for “four-year” in the last sentence of subsection E.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 764 and 766 are identical, and added subsection J.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 373 added subsection K.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Relocation of residence of board member to another state. —

A member of the Board for Community Colleges may continue to serve after relocating his residence to another state; however, the board member will be ineligible for reappointment to the board if his residence remains outside the Commonwealth when his term expires. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Arnold R. Oliver, Chancellor, Virginia Community College System, 00-004, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (5/1/00).

§ 23.1-1301.
Governing boards; powers.

The board of visitors of each baccalaureate public institution of higher education or its designee may:

Make regulations and policies concerning the institution;

Manage the funds of the institution and approve an annual budget;

Appoint the chief executive officer of the institution;

Appoint professors and fix their salaries; and

Fix the rates charged to students for tuition, mandatory fees, and other necessary charges.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education or its designee may:

In addition to the powers set forth in Restructured Higher Education Financial and Administrative Operations Act (§

23.1-1000

et seq.), lease or sell and convey its interest in any real property that it has acquired by purchase, will, or deed of gift, subject to the prior approval of the Governor and any terms and conditions of the will or deed of gift, if applicable. The proceeds shall be held, used, and administered in the same manner as all other gifts and bequests;

Grant easements for roads, streets, sewers, waterlines, electric and other utility lines, or other purposes on any property owned by the institution;

Adopt regulations or institution policies for parking and traffic on property owned, leased, maintained, or controlled by the institution;

Adopt regulations or institution policies for the employment and dismissal of professors, teachers, instructors, and other employees;

Adopt regulations or institution policies for the acceptance and assistance of students in addition to the regulations or institution policies required pursuant to §

23.1-1303

;

Adopt regulations or institution policies for the conduct of students in attendance and for the rescission or restriction of financial aid, suspension, and dismissal of students who fail or refuse to abide by such regulations or policies;

Establish programs, in cooperation with the Council and the Office of the Attorney General, to promote (i) student compliance with state laws on the use of alcoholic beverages and (ii) the awareness and prevention of sexual crimes committed upon students;

Establish guidelines for the initiation or induction of students into any social fraternity or sorority in accordance with the prohibition against hazing as defined in §

18.2-56

;

Assign any interest it possesses in intellectual property or in materials in which the institution claims an interest, provided such assignment is in accordance with the terms of the institution’s intellectual property policies adopted pursuant to §

23.1-1303

. The Governor’s prior written approval is required for transfers of such property (i) developed wholly or predominantly through the use of state general funds, exclusive of capital assets and (ii)(a) developed by an employee of the institution acting within the scope of his assigned duties or (b) for which such transfer is made to an entity other than (1) the Innovation and Entrepreneurship Investment Authority, (2) an entity whose purpose is to manage intellectual properties on behalf of nonprofit organizations, colleges, and universities, or (3) an entity whose purpose is to benefit the respective institutions. The Governor may attach conditions to these transfers as he deems necessary. In the event the Governor does not approve such transfer, the materials shall remain the property of the respective institutions and may be used and developed in any manner permitted by law;

Conduct closed meetings pursuant to §§

2.2-3711

and

2.2-3712

and conduct business through electronic communication means pursuant to §

2.2-3708.3

; and

Adopt a resolution to require the governing body of a locality that is contiguous to the institution to enforce state statutes and local ordinances with respect to offenses occurring on the property of the institution. Upon receipt of such resolution, the governing body of such locality shall enforce statutes and local ordinances with respect to offenses occurring on the property of the institution.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 811, 837, 842, 864, 865, 935, 936, 951, §§ 23-76, 23-99, 23-103, 23-122, 23-124, 23-128, 23-167; 1922, p. 319; 1924, pp. 143, 144, 164, 208; 1930, p. 768; 1936, p. 522, § 23-77.1; 1938, pp. 442, 444; Michie Code 1942, § 938a; 1944, p. 402; 1945, p. 52; 1954, cc. 92, 185, 296 §§ 23-4.1, 23-77.2; 1956, cc. 12, 689; 1960, c. 180, §§ 23-44, 23-45; 1962, c. 69, §§ 23-49.17, 23-49.18; 1964, cc. 50, 70, 159, §§ 23-155.7, 23-155.8, 23-164.6, 23-164.7, 23-165.6, 23-165.7, 23-188, 23-189; 1966, cc. 18, 313, § 23-49.21; 1968, cc. 93, 532, 545, 993, §§ 23-50.8, 23-50.10, 23-50.11, 23-50.13, 23-174.6; 1970, cc. 98, 166; 1972, cc. 550, 861, §§ 23-91.29, 23-91.30, 23-91.33, 23-91.40, 23-91.41, 23-91.44; 1974, c. 317; 1976, c. 21, §§ 23-49.28, 23-49.29, 23-49.32; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 1978, c. 376; 1979, cc. 136, 145, 146, 147; 1980, c. 100; 1986, c. 358, § 23-4.4; 1990, c. 106; 1992, c. 103; 1996, cc. 905, 1046; 2002, c. 158, 257, 368; 2003, c. 708; 2004, cc. 176, 195; 2006, cc. 77, 899; 2009, cc. 325, 810; 2013, c. 577, § 23-2.01; 2015, cc. 579, 580; 2016, c. 588; 2018, c. 55; 2022, c. 597.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 55 substituted “subsection D of §

2.2-3708

.2” for “subsection B of §

2.2-3708

” in subdivision B 10.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 597, substituted “business through electronic communication means pursuant to §

2.2-3708.3

” for “business as a `state public body’ for purposes of subsection D of §

2.2-3708.2

” in subdivision B 10.

Law Review.

For article, “The Legality of Ticket Tie-Ins in Intercollegiate Athletics,” see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1980).

§ 23.1-1301.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 490, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

23.1-1301.1

, pertaining to electric vehicle charging stations, derived from Acts
2018, cc. 295,
446.

§ 23.1-1302.
Governing boards; additional powers; voluntary early retirement.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education may establish a compensation plan designed to provide incentives for voluntary early retirement of teaching and research staff employed in nonclassified, faculty positions. Participation in such compensation plan is voluntary for eligible employees and no employee shall be penalized in any way for not participating.

In order to qualify for participation in such compensation plan, an eligible faculty employee shall (i) be at least 60 years old; (ii) have completed at least 10 years of full-time service at the institution offering the plan; (iii) have been awarded tenure or have a contractual right to continued employment; (iv) agree to withdraw from active membership in the Virginia Retirement System; and (v) comply with any additional criteria established by the governing board of the institution.

Any compensation plan established pursuant to this section shall include the institutional needs and objectives to be served, the kind of incentives to be offered, the sources of available funding for implementation, and any additional qualifications required of eligible faculty employees established by the governing board. Any such compensation plan shall explicitly reserve to the governing board the authority to modify, amend, or repeal the plan. However, no such amendment, modification, or repeal is effective as to any individual who retires under the plan prior to the effective date of the amendment, modification, or repeal.

The cash payments offered under any such compensation plan shall not exceed 150 percent of the employee’s base annual salary reflected in the Personnel Management Information System at the time of election to participate. Any such payment shall be allocated over at least two years. Such compensation may include payment of insurance benefits by the institution until the participant reaches the age of 65. The total cost in any fiscal year for any compensation plan established under this section shall not exceed one percent of the institution’s corresponding fiscal year state general fund appropriation for faculty salaries and associated benefits.

The Governor may establish, with the assistance of the Council, uniform criteria for such compensation plans. Prior to the adoption, modification, amendment, or repeal of any such compensation plan, the governing board shall obtain the Governor’s approval. The Governor shall provide a copy of each approved plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. All compensation plans shall be reviewed for legal sufficiency by the Office of the Attorney General prior to adoption, modification, amendment, or repeal.

The Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) does not apply to the establishment of such compensation plans or any implementing regulations or criteria.

History.

1988, c. 246, § 23-9.2:3.1; 2005, c. 633; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item
§ 4-6.01 m 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of visitors or other governing body of any public institution of higher education is authorized to establish age and service eligibility criteria for faculty participating in voluntary early retirement incentive plans for their respective institutions pursuant to
§

23.1-1302

B and the cash payment offered under such compensation plans pursuant to
§

23.1-1302

D, Code of Virginia. Notwithstanding the limitations in
§ 23.1-1302 D, the total cost in any fiscal year for any such compensation plan, shall be set forth by the governing body in the compensation plan for approval by the Governor and review for legal sufficiency by the Office of the Attorney General.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-1303.
Governing boards; duties.

For purposes of this section, “intellectual property” means (i) a potentially patentable machine, article of manufacture, composition of matter, process, or improvement in any of those; (ii) an issued patent; (iii) a legal right that inheres in a patent; or (iv) anything that is copyrightable.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education shall:

Adopt and post conspicuously on its website bylaws for its own governance, including provisions that (i) establish the requirement of transparency, to the extent required by law, in all board actions; (ii) describe the board’s obligations under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), as set forth in subdivision B 10 of §

23.1-1301

, including the requirements that (a) the board record minutes of each open meeting and post the minutes on the board’s website, in accordance with subsection H of §

2.2-3707

and §

2.2-3707

.1, (b) discussions and actions on any topic not specifically exempted by §

2.2-3711

be held in an open meeting, (c) the board give public notice of all meetings, in accordance with subsection C of §

2.2-3707

, and (d) any action taken in a closed meeting be approved in an open meeting before it can have any force or effect, in accordance with subsection B of §

2.2-3711

; and (iii) require that the board invite the Attorney General’s appointee or representative to all meetings of the board, executive committee, and board committees;

Establish and maintain on the institution’s website (i) a listing of all board members, including the name of the Governor who made each appointment and the date of each appointment; (ii) a listing of all committees created by the board and the membership of each committee; (iii) a schedule of all upcoming meetings of the full board and its committees and instructions for the public to access such meetings; (iv) an archive of agendas and supporting materials for each meeting of the governing board and its committees that was held; and (v) an email address or email addresses that allow board members to receive public communications pertaining to board business;

Establish regulations or institution policies for the acceptance and assistance of students that include provisions (i) that specify that individuals who have knowingly and willfully failed to meet the federal requirement to register for the selective service are not eligible to receive any state direct student assistance, (ii) that specify that the accreditation status of a public high school in the Commonwealth shall not be considered in making admissions determinations for students who have earned a diploma pursuant to the requirements established by the Board of Education, and (iii) relating to the admission of certain graduates of comprehensive community colleges as set forth in §

23.1-907

;

Assist the Council in enforcing the provisions relating to eligibility for financial aid;

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, establish policies and procedures requiring the notification of the parent of a dependent student when such student receives mental health treatment at the institution’s student health or counseling center and such treatment becomes part of the student’s educational record in accordance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.) and may be disclosed without prior consent as authorized by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and related regulations (34 C.F.R. Part 99). Such notification shall only be required if it is determined that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness the student will, in the near future, (i) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior or any other relevant information or (ii) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs. However, notification may be withheld if any person licensed to diagnose and treat mental, emotional, or behavioral disorders by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions who is treating the student has made a part of the student’s record a written statement that, in the exercise of his professional judgment, the notification would be reasonably likely to cause substantial harm to the student or another person. No public institution of higher education or employee of a public institution of higher education making a disclosure pursuant to this subsection is civilly liable for any harm resulting from such disclosure unless such disclosure constitutes gross negligence or willful misconduct by the institution or its employees;

Establish policies and procedures requiring the release of the educational record of a dependent student, as defined by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g), to a parent at his request;

Establish programs to seek to ensure that all graduates have the technology skills necessary to compete in the twenty-first century and that all students matriculating in teacher-training programs receive instruction in the effective use of educational technology;

Establish policies for the discipline of students who participate in varsity intercollegiate athletics, including a provision requiring an annual report by the administration of the institution to the governing board regarding enforcement actions taken pursuant to such policies;

In addition to all meetings prescribed in Chapters 14 (§

23.1-1400

et seq.) through 29 (§

23.1-2900

et seq.), meet with the chief executive officer of the institution at least once annually, in a closed meeting pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

2.2-3711

and deliver an evaluation of the chief executive officer’s performance. Any change to the chief executive officer’s employment contract during any such meeting or any other meeting of the board shall be made only by a vote of the majority of the board’s members;

If human research, as defined in §

32.1-162.16

, is conducted at the institution, adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to effectuate the provisions of Chapter 5.1 (§

32.1-162.16

et seq.) of Title 32.1 for human research. Such regulations shall require the human research committee to submit to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the chief executive officer of the institution or his designee at least annually a report on the human research projects reviewed and approved by the committee and require the committee to report any significant deviations from approved proposals;

Submit and make publicly available on the institution’s website the annual financial statements for the fiscal year ending the preceding June 30 and the accounts and status of any ongoing capital projects to the Auditor of Public Accounts for the audit of such statements pursuant to § 30-133;

No later than December 1 of each year, report to the Council and make publicly available on the institution’s website (i) the value of investments as reflected on the Statement of Net Position as of June 30 of the previous fiscal year, excluding any funds derived from endowment donations, endowment income, or other private philanthropy; (ii) the cash earnings on such balances in the previous fiscal year; and (iii) the use of the cash earnings on such balances. In the event that the commitment of any such investment earnings spans more than one fiscal year, the report shall reflect the commitments made in each future fiscal year. The reports of the Boards of Visitors of Virginia Commonwealth University and the University of Virginia shall exclude the value of and earnings on any investments held by the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority and the University of Virginia Medical Center, respectively. As used in this subdivision, “investments” includes all short-term, long-term, liquid, and illiquid Statement of Net Position accounts, and subaccounts thereof, in which moneys have been invested in securities.

Submit to the General Assembly and the Governor and make publicly available on the institution’s website an annual executive summary of its interim activity and work no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website;

Make available to any interested party upon request a copy of the portion of the most recent report of the Uniform Crime Reporting Section of the Department of State Police entitled “Crime in Virginia” pertaining to institutions of higher education;

Adopt policies or institution regulations regarding the ownership, protection, assignment, and use of intellectual property and provide a copy of such policies or institution regulations to the Governor and the Joint Commission on Technology and Science. All employees, including student employees, of public institutions of higher education are bound by the intellectual property policies or institution regulations of the institution employing them;

Adopt policies that are supportive of the intellectual property rights of matriculated students who are not employed by such institution; and

Solicit the input of representatives of the institution’s faculty senate or its equivalent (i) at least twice per academic year on topics of general interest to the faculty and (ii) in advance of decisions to be made on the search for the institution’s new chief executive officer.

History.

Code 1919, § 837, § 23-99; 1970, c. 197, § 23-9.2:3; 1972, c. 861, § 23-91.40; 1984, c. 734, § 23-1.01; 1985, cc. 146, 520; 1986, c. 358, § 23-4.3; 1987, c. 109; 1990, c. 646, § 23-9.1:1; 1992, cc. 603, 630, § 23-9.2:3.3; 1997, c. 827; 1998, cc. 39, 362, 483, 784; 2001, cc. 664, 673; 2004, cc. 176, 195, 650; 2005, cc. 633, 818; 2006, cc. 77, 121, 899; 2008, cc. 441, 495; 2012, cc. 448, 658, 716; 2013, c. 577, §§ 23-2.02, 23-2.03, 23-2.05; 2014, c. 557, § 23-2.5; 2016, cc. 441, 588; 2017, cc. 314, 320, 616; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 447.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 441 amended former § 23-4.3, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by c. 441 has been given effect in this section by inserting “including student employees” following “All employees” in the second sentence of subdivision B 13 and adding subdivision B 14.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 447, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, in consultation with the Virginia Freedom of Information Advisory Council, shall work with the public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth and with technology experts to develop a minimal uniform standard, to the extent practicable, for providing the public with real-time electronic access to meetings of the governing boards of public institutions of higher education. Such minimal uniform standard shall be implemented by each public institution of higher education no later than July 1, 2022, and any policy changes necessary to effectuate such implementation shall be recommended to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than November 1, 2021.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 447, cl. 3 provides: “That pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 15 of
§

23.1-203

of the Code of Virginia, the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall consider updates to
§

23.1-1304

of the Code of Virginia and to other provisions of law to address changes being made by public institutions of higher education whose governing boards hold virtual meetings and the institutions’ efforts to improve public transparency through real-time electronic access to such meetings and shall report any recommendations to the governing board of each public institution of higher education and to the General Assembly no later than November 1, 2021.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, inserted “or institution regulations” following “copy of such policies” in the first sentence and following “intellectual property policies” in the second sentence of subdivision B 14.

The 2017 amendment by c. 320 inserted subdivision B 11 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment by c. 616, in subdivision B 1, substituted “subsection H” for “subsection I” in clause (a).

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 447, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subdivision B 2 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, inserted “and make publicly available on the institution’s website” near the beginning of subdivision B 11 through B 13, added subdivision B 17, and made stylistic changes.

§ 23.1-1304.
Governing boards; additional duties; educational programs.

From such funds as are appropriated for such purpose, the Council shall develop, in consultation with public institutions of higher education and members of their governing boards, and annually deliver educational programs for the governing boards of such institutions. New members of such governing boards shall participate, at least once during their first two years of membership, in the programs, which shall be designed to address the role, duties, and responsibilities of the governing boards and may include in-service programs on current issues in higher education. In developing such programs, the Council may consider similar educational programs for institutional governing boards in other states. In addition, the Council shall develop educational materials for board members with more than two years of service on the governing board. Each such board member shall participate in further training on board governance at least once every two years, and the Council shall develop criteria by which such board members shall demonstrate compliance with this requirement.

Educational programs for the governing boards of public institutions of higher education shall include presentations relating to:

Board members’ primary duty to the citizens of the Commonwealth;

Governing board committee structure and function;

The duties of the executive committee set forth in §

23.1-1306

;

Professional accounting and reporting standards;

Methods for meeting the statutory, regulatory, and fiduciary obligations of the board;

The requirements of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), developed and delivered in conjunction with the Freedom of Information Advisory Council;

Institutional ethics and conflicts of interest;

Creating and implementing regulations and institution policies;

Business operations, administration, budgeting, financing, financial reporting, and financial reserves, including a segment on endowment management;

Fixing student tuition, mandatory fees, and other necessary charges, including a review of student debt trends;

Overseeing planning, construction, maintenance, expansion, and renovation projects that affect the institution’s consolidated infrastructure, physical facilities, and natural environment, including its lands, improvements, and capital equipment;

Workforce planning, strategy, and investment;

Institutional advancement, including philanthropic giving, fundraising initiatives, alumni programming, communications and media, government and public relations, and community affairs;

Student welfare issues, including academic studies; curriculum; residence life; student governance and activities; and the general physical and psychological well-being of undergraduate and graduate students;

Current national and state issues in higher education;

Future national and state issues in higher education;

Relations between the governing board and the chief executive officer of the institution, including perspectives from chief executive officers of public institutions of higher education;

Best practices for board governance, including perspectives from current board members; and

Any other topics that the Council, public institutions of higher education, and members of their governing boards deem necessary or appropriate.

The Council shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Council pursuant to this section no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

1996, cc. 868, 992, § 23-9.14:1; 2013, c. 577; 2014, c. 644; 2016, c. 588; 2019, cc. 642, 643; 2020, cc. 155, 156.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 473, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of the first enactment of this act, any member of the board of visitors of a four-year public institution of higher education or the State Board for Community Colleges who was appointed to such board prior to July 1, 2013, and fails to attend the educational programs required by
§ 23-9.14:1 [now
§

23.1-1304

] of the Code of Virginia during his first four-year term shall attend such educational programs during the first two years of his subsequent term on such board.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item
§ 4-9.04 c, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of
§

23.1-1304

, the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall annually train boards of visitors members on the types of information members should request from institutions to inform decision making, such as performance measures, benchmarking data, the impact of financial decisions on student costs, and past and projected cost trends. Boards of Visitors members serving on finance and facilities subcommittees should, at a minimum, participate in the training within their first year of membership on the subcommittee. SCHEV should obtain assistance in developing or delivering the training from relevant agencies such as the Department of General Services and past or present finance officers at Virginia’s public four-year institutions, as appropriate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 447, cl. 3 provides: “That pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 15 of
§

23.1-203

of the Code of Virginia, the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall consider updates to
§

23.1-1304

of the Code of Virginia and to other provisions of law to address changes being made by public institutions of higher education whose governing boards hold virtual meetings and the institutions’ efforts to improve public transparency through real-time electronic access to such meetings and shall report any recommendations to the governing board of each public institution of higher education and to the General Assembly no later than November 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 642, in subdivision B 1, substituted “primary duty to the citizens of the Commonwealth” for “duty to the Commonwealth”; and in subdivision B 10, added “and student debt trends” at the end.

The 2019 amendment by c. 643 added “including a review of student debt trends” at the end of subdivision B 10; and made a stylistic change. Subdivision B 10 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 155 and 156 are nearly identical, and added the last two sentences of subsection A, with c. 155 having “a governing board” and c. 156 having “the governing board” at the end of the first sentence added. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Vaccine requirement. —

Virginia's public institutions of higher education, as specified in Title 23.1 of the Code of Virginia, may condition in-person attendance on receipt of an approved COVID-19 vaccine during this time of pandemic. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark L. Keam, Member, House of Delegates, 21-030, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (4/26/21).